Massachusetts, session 194th, H4897.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 34 the following new section:-
Section 35. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Behavioral health bundled services”, services delivered by a community behavioral
health center as specified in 101 CMR 305.00 for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care
coordination, management, or peer support of patients with mental health, developmental or
substance use disorder, provided that services are reimbursed through a flat rate per encounter.
“Community Behavioral Health Centers”, a clinic licensed by the department of public
health and regulated pursuant to 130 CMR 448.00.
(b) Any health plan offered by the commission shall provide to an active or retired
employee of the commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission benefits
of 4

on a nondiscriminatory basis for medically necessary behavioral health bundled services
delivered through community behavioral health centers.
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting before
section 47CCC the following new section:-
Section 47AAA. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Behavioral health bundled services”, services delivered by a community behavioral
health center as specified in 101 CMR 305.00 for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care
coordination, management, or peer support of patients with mental health, developmental or
substance use disorder, provided that services are reimbursed through a flat rate per encounter.
“Community Behavioral Health Centers”, a clinic licensed by the department of public
health and regulated pursuant to 130 CMR 448.00.
(b) Any individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section
108, which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, and a group blanket or
general policy of accident and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 110, which provides
hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, which is issued or renewed within or without
the commonwealth, shall provide benefits on a nondiscriminatory basis for medically necessary
behavioral health bundled services delivered through community behavioral health centers.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 38 the following new section:-
of 4

Section 39. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Behavioral health bundled services”, services delivered by a community behavioral
health center as specified in title 101 CMR 305.00 for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care
coordination, management, or peer support of patients with mental health, developmental or
substance use disorder, provided that services are reimbursed through a flat rate per encounter.
“Community Behavioral Health Centers”, a clinic licensed by the department of public
health and regulated pursuant to 130 CMR 448.00.
(b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan which is issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall
provide benefits on a nondiscriminatory basis for medically necessary behavioral health bundled
services delivered through community behavioral health centers.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 25 the following new section:-
Section 26. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Behavioral health bundled services”, services delivered by a community behavioral
health center as specified in title 101 CMR 305.00 for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care
coordination, management, or peer support of patients with mental health, developmental or
substance use disorder, provided that services are reimbursed through a flat rate per encounter.
of 4

“Community Behavioral Health Centers”, a clinic licensed by the department of public
health and regulated pursuant to 130 CMR 448.00.
(b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
which is issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide benefits on a
nondiscriminatory basis for medically necessary behavioral health bundled services delivered
through community behavioral health centers.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 33 the following new section:-
Section 34. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Behavioral health bundled services”, services delivered by a community behavioral
health center as specified in 101 CMR 305.00 for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, care
coordination, management, or peer support of patients with mental health, developmental or
substance use disorder, provided that services are reimbursed through a flat rate per encounter.
“Community Behavioral Health Centers”, a clinic licensed by the department of public
health and regulated pursuant to title 130 CMR 448.00.
(b) Any health maintenance contract issued or renewed within or without the
commonwealth shall provide benefits on a nondiscriminatory basis for medically necessary
behavioral health bundled services delivered through community behavioral health centers.
of 4